Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Subchapter 2. Jurisdiction

§ 3161.
Definitions; significant connection factors.

In this subchapter:

“Emergency” means a circumstance that likely will result in serious and irreparable harm to a respondent’s physical health, safety, or welfare, and for which the appointment of a guardian is necessary because no other person has authority and is willing to act on the respondent’s behalf.

“Home state” means the state in which the respondent was physically present, including any period of temporary absence, for at least six consecutive months immediately before the filing of a petition for a protective order or the appointment of a guardian; or if none, the state in which the respondent was physically present, including any period of temporary absence, for at least six consecutive months ending within the six months prior to the filing of the petition.

“Significant-connection state” means a state, other than the home state, with which a respondent has a significant connection other than mere physical presence and in which substantial evidence concerning the respondent is available.

In determining under section 3163 and subsection 3171(e) of this title whether a respondent has a significant connection with a particular state, the Probate Division shall consider:

the location of the respondent’s family and other persons required to be notified of the guardianship or protective proceeding;

the length of time the respondent at any time was physically present in the state and the duration of any absence;

the location of the respondent’s property; and

the extent to which the respondent has ties to the state such as voting registration, state or local tax return filing, vehicle registration, driver’s license, social relationship, or receipt of services.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 56

, § 25.

§ 3162.
Exclusive basis.

This subchapter provides the exclusive jurisdictional basis for a Probate Division of the Superior Court of this State to appoint a guardian or issue a protective order for an adult. The Probate Division of the Superior Court shall have exclusive original jurisdiction to determine whether this State has jurisdiction pursuant to this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 56

, § 25.

§ 3163.
Jurisdiction.

A Probate Division of the Superior Court of this State has jurisdiction to appoint a guardian or issue a protective order for a respondent if:

this State is the respondent’s home state;

on the date the petition is filed, this State is a significant-connection state and:

the respondent does not have a home state or a court of the respondent’s home state has declined to exercise jurisdiction because this State is a more appropriate forum; or

the respondent has a home state, a petition for an appointment or order is not pending in a court of that state or another significant-connection state, and, before the Probate Division makes the appointment or issues the order:

a petition for an appointment or order is not filed in the respondent’s home state;

an objection to the Probate Division’s jurisdiction is not filed by a person required to be notified of the proceeding; and

the Probate Division of the Superior Court in this State concludes that it is an appropriate forum under the factors set forth in section 3166 of this title;

this State does not have jurisdiction under either subdivision (1) or (2) of this section, the respondent’s home state, and all significant-connection states have declined to exercise jurisdiction because this State is the more appropriate forum, and jurisdiction in this State is consistent with the constitutions of this State and the United States; or

the requirements for special jurisdiction under section 3164 of this title are met.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 56

, § 25.

§ 3164.
Special jurisdiction.

A Probate Division of the Superior Court of this State lacking jurisdiction under section 3163 of this title has special jurisdiction to do any of the following:

appoint a guardian in an emergency for a term not exceeding 90 days for a respondent who is physically present in this State;

issue a protective order with respect to real or tangible personal property located in this State;

appoint a guardian or conservator for an incapacitated or protected person for whom a provisional order to transfer the proceeding from another state has been issued under procedures similar to section 3171 of this title.

If a petition for the appointment of a guardian in an emergency is brought in this State and this State was not the respondent’s home state on the date the petition was filed, the Probate Division shall dismiss the proceeding at the request of the court of the home state, if any, whether dismissal is requested before or after the emergency appointment.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 56

, § 25.

§ 3165.
Exclusive and continuing jurisdiction.

Except as otherwise provided in section 3164 of this title, a court that has appointed a guardian or issued a protective order consistent with this chapter has exclusive jurisdiction over the proceeding until jurisdiction is terminated by the Probate Division or the appointment or order expires by its own terms.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 56

, § 25.

§ 3166.
Appropriate forum.

A Probate Division of the Superior Court of this State having jurisdiction under section 3163 of this title to appoint a guardian or issue a protective order may decline to exercise its jurisdiction if it determines at any time that a court of another state is a more appropriate forum.

If a Probate Division of the Superior Court of this State declines to exercise its jurisdiction under subsection (a) of this section, it shall either dismiss or stay the proceeding. The Probate Division may impose any condition the court considers just and proper, including the condition that a petition for the appointment of a guardian or issuance of a protective order be filed promptly in another state.

In determining whether it is an appropriate forum, the Probate Division shall consider all relevant factors, including:

any expressed preference of the respondent;

whether abuse, neglect, or exploitation of the respondent has occurred or is likely to occur and which state could best protect the respondent from the abuse, neglect, or exploitation;

the length of time the respondent was physically present in or was a legal resident of this or another state;

the distance of the respondent from the court in each state;

the financial circumstances of the respondent’s estate;

the nature and location of the evidence;

the ability of the court of each state to decide the issue expeditiously and the procedures necessary to present evidence;

the familiarity of the court of each state with the facts and issues in the proceeding; and

if an appointment were made, the court’s ability to monitor the conduct of the guardian or conservator.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 56

, § 25.

§ 3167.
Jurisdiction declined by reason of conduct.

If at any time a Probate Division of the Superior Court of this State determines that it acquired jurisdiction to appoint a guardian or issue a protective order because of unjustifiable conduct, the court may:

decline to exercise jurisdiction;

exercise jurisdiction for the limited purpose of fashioning an appropriate remedy to ensure the health, safety, and welfare of the respondent or the protection of the respondent’s property or prevent a repetition of the unjustifiable conduct, including staying the proceeding until a petition for the appointment of a guardian or issuance of a protective order is filed in a court of another state having jurisdiction; or

continue to exercise jurisdiction after considering:

the extent to which the respondent and all persons required to be notified of the proceedings have acquiesced in the exercise of the Probate Division’s jurisdiction;

whether it is a more appropriate forum than the court of any other state under the factors set forth in subsection 3166(c) of this title; and

whether the court of any other state would have jurisdiction under factual circumstances in substantial conformity with the jurisdictional standards of section 3163 of this title.

If a Probate Division of the Superior Court of this State determines that it acquired jurisdiction to appoint a guardian or issue a protective order because a party seeking to invoke its jurisdiction engaged in unjustifiable conduct, it may assess against the party necessary and reasonable expenses, including attorney’s fees, investigative fees, court costs, communication expenses, witness fees and expenses, and travel expenses. The court may not assess fees, costs, or expenses of any kind against this State or a governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality of this State unless authorized by law other than this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 56

, § 25.

§ 3168.
Notice of proceeding.

If a petition for the appointment of a guardian or issuance of a protective order is brought in this State and this State was not the respondent’s home state on the date the petition was filed, the petitioner shall comply with the notice requirements of this State and shall give notice of the petition to those persons who would be entitled to notice of the petition if a proceeding were brought in the respondent’s home state. The notice must be given in the same manner as notice is required to be given in this State.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 56

, § 25.

§ 3169.
Proceedings in more than one state.

Except for a petition for the appointment of a guardian in an emergency or issuance of a protective order limited to property located in this State under subdivision 3164(a)(1) or (2) of this title, if a petition for the appointment of a guardian or issuance of a protective order is filed in this State and in another state and neither petition has been dismissed or withdrawn, the following rules apply:

If the Probate Division of the Superior Court in this State has jurisdiction under section 3163 of this title, it may proceed with the case unless a court in another state acquires jurisdiction under provisions similar to section 3163 of this title before the appointment or issuance of the order.

If the Probate Division of the Superior Court in this State does not have jurisdiction under section 3163 of this title, whether at the time the petition is filed or at any time before the appointment or issuance of the order, the Probate Division shall stay the proceeding and communicate with the court in the other state. If the court in the other state has jurisdiction, the Probate Division in this State shall dismiss the petition unless the court in the other state determines that the Probate Division of the Superior Court in this State is a more appropriate forum.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 56

, § 25.